Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3991
Dairy products; packaging; containers; labeling.

Dairy products shall be packaged in commercially acceptable containers or packaging material that will protect the quality of the contents in regular channels of trade. Prior to use packaging materials shall be protected against dust, mold, and other possible contamination.

Commercial bulk shipping containers for dairy products shall be legibly marked with the name of the product, net weight or content, name and address of processor, manufacturer, or distributor, and plant code number. Consumer-packaged products shall be legibly marked with the name of the product, net weight or content, plant code number, and name and address of the packer or distributor.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 28, p. 86;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.114;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 37;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3937;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 27.